Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-903
Act; not applicable to financial institutions.

The Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act shall not apply to a financial institution organized under the laws of this state or the laws of the United States.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 3.